Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 239.791, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Exemption for motor sports racing. new text begin (a) new text end A person responsible for the product may offer for sale, sell, or dispense at a public deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin racecourse,new text end private racecourse,new text begin or retail gasoline stationnew text end gasoline that is not oxygenated in accordance with subdivision 1 if the gasoline is intended to be used exclusively as a fuel for off-highway motor sports racing events. new text begin (b) No more than one storage tank on the premises of a retail gasoline station may be used for the storage of nonoxygenated motor sports racing gasoline that is offered for sale, sold, or dispensed at the station. The pump stand at the station must be posted with a permanent, conspicuously placed notice in full view of consumers stating: "FOR USE IN OFF-HIGHWAY MOTOR SPORTS ENGINES ONLY." new text end